Washington statutes.
RCW 43.01.073

Refund of fees or other payments collected by state—Voucher.

Any state agency desiring to authorize such a refund shall file with the state treasurer a voucher naming the payee and giving full particulars as to the reason for the refund and the fund in the treasury to which it was credited.

[ 1965 c 8 s 43.01.073. Prior: 1955 c 224 s 2.]